software/EmEditor/Dictionaries/en_us_ru_ru.aff
SFX 41 Y 179
SFX 41   ться вутся        житься
SFX 41   ться вусь         житься
SFX 41   ться вешься       житься
SFX 41   ться вется        житься
SFX 41   ться ветесь       житься
SFX 41   ться вемся        житься
SFX 41   ться вёшься       житься
SFX 41   ться вётся        житься
SFX 41   ться вётесь       житься
SFX 41   ться вёмся        житься
SFX 41   ться нутся        деться
SFX 41   ться нусь         деться
SFX 41   ться нешься       деться
SFX 41   ться нется        деться
SFX 41   ться нетесь       деться
SFX 41   ться немся        деться
SFX 41   ться ешься        уться
SFX 41   ться ется         уться
SFX 41   ться етесь        уться
SFX 41   ться емся         уться
SFX 41   ться ются         уться
SFX 41   ться юсь          уться
SFX 41   ть   вут          жить
SFX 41   ть   ву           жить
SFX 41   ть   вешь         жить
SFX 41   ть   вете         жить
SFX 41   ть   вет          жить
SFX 41   ть   вем          жить
SFX 41   ть   вёшь         жить
SFX 41   ть   вёте         жить
SFX 41   ть   вёт          жить
SFX 41   ть   вём          жить
SFX 41   ть   нут          деть
SFX 41   ть   ну           деть
SFX 41   ть   нешь         деть
SFX 41   ть   нете         деть
SFX 41   ть   нет          деть
SFX 41   ть   нем          деть
SFX 41   ть   ешь          уть
SFX 41   ть   ете          уть
SFX 41   ть   ет           уть
SFX 41   ть   ем           уть
SFX 41   ть   ют           уть
SFX 41   ть   ю            уть
SFX 41   яться ешься        яться
SFX 41   яться ется         яться
SFX 41   яться етесь        яться
SFX 41   яться емся         яться
SFX 41   яться ются         яться
SFX 41   яться юсь          яться
SFX 41   яться ёшься        яться
SFX 41   яться ётся         яться
SFX 41   яться ётесь        яться
SFX 41   яться ёмся         яться
SFX 41   ять  ешь          ять
SFX 41   ять  ете          ять
SFX 41   ять  ет           ять
SFX 41   ять  ем           ять
SFX 41   ять  ют           ять
SFX 41   ять  ю            ять
SFX 41   ять  ёшь          ять
SFX 41   ять  ёте          ять
SFX 41   ять  ёт           ять
SFX 41   ять  ём           ять
SFX 41   оваться уешься       оваться
SFX 41   оваться уется        оваться
SFX 41   оваться уетесь       оваться
SFX 41   оваться уемся        оваться
SFX 41   оваться уются        оваться
SFX 41   оваться уюсь         оваться
SFX 41   оваться уёшься       оваться
SFX 41   оваться уётся        оваться
SFX 41   оваться уётесь       оваться
SFX 41   оваться уёмся        оваться
SFX 41   овать уешь         овать
SFX 41   овать уете         овать
SFX 41   овать ует          овать
SFX 41   овать уем          овать
SFX 41   овать уют          овать
SFX 41   овать ую           овать
SFX 41   овать уёшь         овать
SFX 41   овать уёте         овать
SFX 41   овать уёт          овать
SFX 41   овать уём          овать
SFX 41   иться ьешься       [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьется        [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьетесь       [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьемся        [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьются        [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьюсь         [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьёшься       [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьётся        [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьётесь       [блпв]иться
SFX 41   иться ьёмся        [блпв]иться
SFX 41   ить  ьешь         [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьете         [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьет          [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьем          [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьют          [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ью           [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьёшь         [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьёте         [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьёт          [блпв]ить
SFX 41   ить  ьём          [блпв]ить
SFX 41   хаться дутся        хаться
SFX 41   хаться дусь         хаться
SFX 41   хаться дешься       хаться
SFX 41   хаться дется        хаться
SFX 41   хаться детесь       хаться
SFX 41   хаться демся        хаться
SFX 41   хать дут          хать
SFX 41   хать ду           хать
SFX 41   хать дешь         хать
SFX 41   хать дете         хать
SFX 41   хать дет          хать
SFX 41   хать дем          хать
SFX 41   ечься яжешься      лечься
SFX 41   ечься яжется       лечься
SFX 41   ечься яжетесь      лечься
SFX 41   ечься яжемся       лечься
SFX 41   ечься ягутся       лечься
SFX 41   ечься ягусь        лечься
SFX 41   ечь  яжешь        лечь
SFX 41   ечь  яжете        лечь
SFX 41   ечь  яжет         лечь
SFX 41   ечь  яжем         лечь
SFX 41   ечь  ягут         лечь
SFX 41   ечь  ягу          лечь
SFX 41   еваться уется        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться уются        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться уётся        [цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юешься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юется        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юетесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юемся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юются        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться ююсь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юёшься       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юётся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юётесь       [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   еваться юёмся        [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX 41   евать уешь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать уете         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать ует          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать уем          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать уют          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать ую           [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать уёшь         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать уёте         [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать уёт          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать уём          [цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юешь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юете         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юет          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юем          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юют          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юю           [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юёшь         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юёте         [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юёт          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   евать юём          [^цжшщч]евать
SFX 41   аться лешься       паться
SFX 41   аться лется        паться
SFX 41   аться летесь       паться
SFX 41   аться лемся        паться
SFX 41   аться лются        паться
SFX 41   аться люсь         паться
SFX 41   ать  ут           дать
SFX 41   ать  у            дать
SFX 41   ать  лешь         пать
SFX 41   ать  лете         пать
SFX 41   ать  лет          пать
SFX 41   ать  лем          пать
SFX 41   ать  лют          пать
SFX 41   ать  лю           пать
SFX 41   ать  ешь          дать
SFX 41   ать  ете          дать
SFX 41   ать  ет           дать
SFX 41   ать  ем           дать

SFX 42 Y 28
SFX 42   зиться жусь         зиться
SFX 42   зить жу           зить
SFX 42   ься  ся           иться
SFX 42   ься  есь          иться
SFX 42   ь    е            ить
SFX 42   ться шься         иться
SFX 42   ться мся          иться
SFX 42   ть   шь           ить
SFX 42   ть   т            ить
SFX 42   ть   м            ить
SFX 42   титься чусь         [^юаеиоясуыэч]титься
SFX 42   тить чу           [^юаеиоясуыэч]тить
SFX 42   ститься щусь         ститься
SFX 42   стить щу           стить
SFX 42   ситься шусь         ситься
SFX 42   сить шу           сить
SFX 42   иться усь          [жшщч]иться
SFX 42   иться ятся         [^жшщч]иться
SFX 42   иться люсь         [бфмпв]иться
SFX 42   иться атся         [жшщч]иться
SFX 42   иться юсь          [аелнору]иться
SFX 42   ить  у            [жшщч]ить
SFX 42   ить  ят           [^жшщч]ить
SFX 42   ить  лю           [бфмпв]ить
SFX 42   ить  ат           [жшщч]ить
SFX 42   ить  ю            [аелнору]ить
SFX 42   диться жусь         диться
SFX 42   дить жу           дить

SFX 43 Y 3
SFX 43   e     ions       e
SFX 43   y     ications   y
SFX 43   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX 44 Y 3
SFX 44   ый   ы            нный
SFX 44   ый   о            нный
SFX 44   ый   а            нный

SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45   0     ly         .
